Hawaii statutes.
§291C-32 Traffic-control signal legend.
(a) Whenever traffic is controlled by traffic-control signals exhibiting
different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time
or in combination, only the colors green, red, and yellow shall be used, except
for special pedestrian signals carrying a word or symbol legend, and the lights
shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows:

(1) Green indication:

(A) Vehicular traffic facing a circular green
signal may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign at the
place prohibits either such turn. But vehicular traffic, including vehicles
turning right or left, shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to
pedestrians lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk at the
time such signal is exhibited.

(B) Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow
signal, shown alone or in combination with another indication, may cautiously
enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by such arrow, or
such other movement as is permitted by other indications shown at the same
time. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians
lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the
intersection.

(C) Unless otherwise directed by a
pedestrian-control signal, as provided in section 291C-33, pedestrians facing
any green signal, except when the sole green signal is a turn arrow, may
proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk.

(2) Steady yellow indication:

(A) Vehicular traffic facing a steady yellow
signal is thereby warned that the related green movement is being terminated or
that a red indication will be exhibited immediately thereafter when vehicular
traffic shall not enter the intersection.

(B) Pedestrians facing a steady yellow
signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in
section 291C-33, are thereby advised that there is insufficient time to cross
the roadway before a red indication is shown and no pedestrian shall then start
to cross the roadway.

(3) Steady red indication:

(A) Vehicular traffic facing a steady red
signal alone shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before
entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then
before entering the intersection and shall remain standing until an indication
to proceed is shown, except as provided in the next succeeding paragraphs.

(B) The driver of a vehicle which is stopped
in obedience to a steady red indication may make a right turn but shall yield
the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic proceeding as directed by the
signal at said intersection, except that counties by ordinance may prohibit any
such right turn against a steady red indication, which ordinance shall be
effective when a sign is erected at such intersection giving notice thereof.

(C) The driver of a vehicle on a one-way
street which intersects another one-way street on which traffic moves to the
left shall stop in obedience to a steady red indication but may then make a
left turn into said one-way street, but shall yield right-of-way to
pedestrians, proceeding as directed by the signal at said intersection except
that counties by ordinance may prohibit any such left turn as above described
which ordinance shall be effective when a sign is erected at such intersection
giving notice thereof.

(D) Unless otherwise directed by a
pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 291C-33, pedestrians facing a
steady red signal alone shall not enter the roadway.

(b) In the event an official traffic-control
signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, the
provisions of this section shall be applicable except as to those provisions
which by their nature can have no application. Any stop required shall be made
at a sign or marking on the pavement indicating where the stop shall be made,
but in the absence of any such sign or marking the stop shall be made at the
signal. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 190, §1]

Case Notes

Defendant had right of allocution before being sentenced for
violation charge of illegal turn; denial of right reversible error. 77 H. 241
(App.), 883 P.2d 663.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next